California statutes. Education Code
The governing board of every school district shall allow each teacher employed for full time in any regular day school in which two or more teachers are employed, one duty-free lunch period each day in the manner and at the time prescribed by regulation of the State Board of Education.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations fixing the duration of the duty-free lunch period of certificated employees of school districts, the time of day when the lunch period shall be granted, and prescribing the conditions under which the duty-free lunch period shall be allowed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44814.

Recognizing that an adequate lunch period free from duty is essential to the health, morale and efficiency of teachers employed full time in any regular day school, the Legislature declares that it is the policy of the state to encourage school districts to provide for an adequate duty-free lunch period for teachers.

In order to provide for such duty-free lunch periods, the governing board of any school district may utilize recreation personnel or other suitable persons to supervise the pupils of the district during the school lunch period.

The provisions of this section shall prevail over any provision of Section 44813 which conflicts herewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44815.

The governing board of any school district may also utilize persons not having certification qualifications to supervise the pupils of the district during any breakfast period or other nutrition period. The compensation of such personnel may be paid from funds from which the compensation of personnel employed under Section 44814 may be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44816.

Except in districts exempted by the Department of Education and in which regular periodic reports of pupil and employee personnel data are submitted by the principal of each school to the city or district superintendent of schools, or, if no superintendent is employed in the district, to the county superintendent of schools on forms approved by the Department of Education, every teacher in the public elementary schools shall at the close of school during each school year make an annual report to the principal of the school in which he is employed; or, in the case of one-teacher schools, to the city or district superintendent of schools, or, if no superintendent is employed, to the county superintendent of schools on forms furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

Any teacher who is teaching in any school at the close of school shall, in his annual report, include all statistics for the entire school year.

Where one teacher is in charge of a class and keeps the records thereof, assistant teachers or other teachers of the class or any of the pupils thereof who are required to keep no records shall not be required to render reports.

The city, district, or county superintendent of schools shall in no case draw a requisition for the salary of any teacher for the last month of a school term, until the report has been filed by him and approved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44817.

The principal of each elementary school when directed by the city or district superintendent of schools shall submit an annual report to such superintendent, or, if no superintendent is employed in the district, to the county superintendent of schools, on forms furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44818.

The principal of each high school, when directed by the city or district superintendent of schools, shall make an annual report to such superintendent, or, if no superintendent is employed in the district, to the county superintendent of schools, on forms furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44821.

A high school principal shall not enter into any contract to act as a principal or supervising principal of any elementary school, except an elementary school in the district in which the high school is located, without the approval of the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44822.

The principal of any high school may act as principal of any elementary school situated in the high school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44823.

The principal of any high school may act as the supervising principal of two or more elementary schools situated in the high school district without regard to the number of teachers employed in each of the elementary schools, if so desired by the trustees of the elementary school district or districts and the high school board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44824.

A full-time probationary or permanent classroom teacher currently employed by a school district which decides to maintain classes on Saturday or Sunday, or both, shall not, without his written consent, be required to teach under such program for more than 180 full days during a school year, or for more than the number of full days the schools of the district were maintained during the year preceding implementation of weekend classes, whichever is greater. This section shall not be construed as limiting the power of any governing board of a school district to govern the schools of the district, including the assignment of teachers employed by the district. No such classroom teacher shall be assigned to perform services on a Saturday or Sunday if such teacher objects in writing that such assignment would conflict with his or her religious beliefs or practices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employment [44830. - 44929.]

44830.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall employ for positions requiring certification qualifications, only persons who possess the qualifications for those positions prescribed by law. It is contrary to the public policy of this state for a person or persons charged, by the governing boards, with the responsibility of recommending persons for employment by the boards to refuse or to fail to do so for reasons of race, color, religious creed, sex, or national origin of the applicants for that employment.

(b) (1) The governing board of a school district shall not initially hire on a permanent, temporary, or substitute basis a certificated person seeking employment in the capacity designated in the certificated person’s credential unless
 that person has demonstrated basic skills proficiency as provided in Section 44252.5 or is exempt from the requirement by subdivision (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), or (m).

(A) The governing board of a school district, with the authorization of the commission, may administer the state basic skills proficiency test required under Sections 44252 and 44252.5.

(B) The Superintendent, in conjunction with the commission and local governing boards, shall take steps necessary to ensure the effective implementation of this subdivision.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that in effectively implementing this subdivision, the governing boards of school districts shall direct superintendents of schools to prepare for emergencies by developing a pool of qualified emergency substitute teachers. This
 preparation shall include public notice of the test requirements and of the dates and locations of administrations of the tests. The governing board of a school district shall make special efforts to encourage individuals who are known to be qualified in other respects as substitutes to take the state basic skills proficiency test at its earliest administration.

(3) Demonstration of proficiency in reading, writing, and mathematics by a person pursuant to Section 44252 satisfies the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) A certificated person is not required to take the state basic skills proficiency examination if the certificated person has taken and passed it at least once, achieved a passing score on any of the tests specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44252, or possessed a credential before the enactment of the statute that made the test a requirement.

(d) This section does not require a person employed solely for purposes of teaching adults in an apprenticeship program, approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations, to pass the state proficiency assessment instrument as a condition of employment.

(e) This section does not require the holder of a childcare permit or a permit authorizing service in a development center for the handicapped to take the state basic skills proficiency test, so long as the holder of the permit is not required to have a baccalaureate degree.

(f) This section does not require the holder of a credential issued by the commission who seeks an additional credential or authorization to teach, to take the state basic skills proficiency test.

(g) This section does not require the holder of a credential to provide service in the health profession to take the state basic skills proficiency test if that person does not teach in the public schools.

(h) This section does not require the holder of a designated subjects special subjects credential to pass the state basic skills proficiency test as a condition of employment unless the requirements for the specific credential require the possession of a baccalaureate degree. The governing board of a school district, the governing board of a consortium of school districts, or a governing board involved in a joint powers agreement that employs the holder of a designated subjects special subjects credential shall establish its own basic skills proficiency for these credentials and shall arrange for those individuals to be assessed. The basic skills proficiency criteria established by the governing board shall be at least equivalent
 to the test required by the district, or in the case of a consortium or a joint powers agreement, by any of the participating districts, for graduation from high school. The governing board or boards may charge a fee to individuals being tested to cover the costs of the test, including the costs of developing, administering, and grading the test.

(i) This section does not require the holder of a preliminary or clear designated subjects career technical education teaching credential to pass the state basic skills proficiency test.

(j) This section does not require certificated personnel employed under a foreign exchange program to take the state basic skills proficiency test. The maximum period of exemption under this subdivision shall be one year.

(k) This section does not require a credential applicant who qualifies
 for an exemption described in paragraph (10) or (11) of subdivision (b) of Section 44252 to take the state basic skills proficiency test.

(l) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district or county office of education may hire certificated personnel who have not taken the state basic skills proficiency test if that person has not yet been afforded the opportunity to take the test. The person shall take the test at the earliest opportunity and may remain employed by the school district pending the receipt of the person’s test results.

(m) A person is deemed to have demonstrated basic skills proficiency if they possess a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 39.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44830.1.

(a) In addition to any other prohibition or provision, no person who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, shall be hired by a school district in a position requiring certification qualifications or supervising positions requiring certification qualifications. A school district shall not retain in employment a current certificated employee who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, and who is a temporary employee, a substitute employee, or a probationary employee serving before March 15 of the employee’s second probationary year. If any conviction is reversed and the formerly convicted person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial, or the charges are dismissed, this section does not prohibit their employment
 thereafter.

(b) This section applies to any violent, serious, or sex offense which, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony or as a sex offense.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(A) A violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(B) A serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(C) A sex offense is an offense listed in Section 44010 other than those described in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(2) For purposes of this section, a plea of nolo
 contendere to a serious or violent felony or a sex offense constitutes a conviction.

(3) For purposes of this section, the term “school district” has the same meaning as defined in Section 41302.5.

(d) When the governing board of any school district requests a criminal record summary of a temporary, substitute, or probationary certificated employee, two fingerprint cards, bearing the legible rolled and flat impressions of the person’s fingerprints together with a personal description and the fee, shall be submitted, by any means authorized by the Department of Justice, to the Department of Justice.

(e) When the Department of Justice ascertains that an individual who is an applicant for employment by a school district has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or for purposes of implementing the prohibitions
 set forth in Section 44836, any sex offense, as defined in Section 44010, or any controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011, the department shall notify the school district of the criminal information pertaining to the applicant. The notification shall be delivered by telephone or electronic mail to the school district. The notification to the school district shall cease to be made once the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is returning responses within three working days. The Department of Justice shall send by first-class mail or electronic mail a copy of the criminal information to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs associated with processing, reviewing, and supplying the criminal record summary required by this section. In no event shall the fee exceed the actual costs incurred by the department.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a
 person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony or sex offense if that person can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of school employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the school district in which they are a
 resident.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, when the Department of Justice notifies a school district by telephone or electronic mail that a current temporary employee, substitute employee, or probationary employee serving before March 15 of the employee’s second probationary year, has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, that employee shall immediately be placed on leave without pay. When the school district receives written electronic notification of the fact of conviction from the Department of Justice, the employee shall be terminated automatically and without regard to any other procedure for termination specified in this code or school district procedures unless the employee challenges the record of the Department of Justice and the Department of Justice withdraws in writing its notification to the school district. Upon receipt of written withdrawal of notification from the Department of Justice, the
 employee shall immediately be reinstated with full restoration of salary and benefits for the period of time from the suspension without pay to the reinstatement.

(i) An employer shall request subsequent arrest service from the Department of Justice as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(j) Notwithstanding Section 47610, this section applies to a charter school.

(k) This section shall not apply to a certificated employee who applies to renew their credential when both of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The employee’s original application for credential was accompanied by that person’s fingerprints.

(2) The employee has either been continuously employed in one or
 more public school districts since the issuance or last renewal of their credential or their credential has not expired between renewals.

(l) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county superintendent of schools from issuing a temporary certificate to any person described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (k).

(m) This section shall not prohibit a school district from hiring a certificated employee who became a permanent employee of another school district as of October 1, 1997.

(n) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Every agency handling Department of Justice information shall ensure the following:

(1) No recipient may disclose its contents or provide copies of information.

(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be accessible to the custodian of records.

(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination, auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 700 to 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 11.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44830.2.

(a) For situations in which a person is an applicant for employment, or is employed on a part-time or substitute basis, in a position requiring certification qualifications in multiple school districts within a county or within contiguous counties, the districts may agree among themselves to designate a single district, or a county superintendent may agree to act on behalf of participating districts within the county or contiguous counties, for the purposes of performing the following functions:

(1) Sending fingerprints to the Department of Justice.

(2) Receiving reports of convictions of serious and violent felonies.

(3) Reviewing criminal history records and reports of subsequent arrests from the Department of Justice.

(4) Maintaining common lists of persons eligible for employment.

(b) The school district or county superintendent serving in the capacity authorized in subdivision (a) shall be considered the employer for purposes of subdivisions (a), (d), and (g) of Section 44830.1.

(c) Upon receipt from the Department of Justice of a report of conviction of a serious or violent felony, the designated school district or county superintendent shall communicate that fact to the participating districts and remove the affected employee from the common list of persons eligible for employment.

(d) Upon receipt from the Department of Justice of a criminal history record or report of subsequent arrest for any person on a common list of persons eligible for employment, the designated school district or county superintendent shall give notice to the superintendent of any participating district or a person designated in writing by that superintendent, that the report is available for inspection on a confidential basis by the superintendent or authorized designee, at the office of the designated school district or county superintendent, for a period of 30 days following receipt of notice, to enable the employing school district to determine whether the employee meets that district’s criteria for continued employment. The designated school district or county superintendent shall not release a copy of that information to any participating district or any other person, shall retain or dispose of the information in the manner required by law after all participating districts have had an opportunity to inspect it in accordance with this section, and shall maintain a record of all persons to whom the information has been shown that shall be available to the Department of Justice to monitor compliance with the requirements of confidentiality contained in this section.

(e) Any agency processing Department of Justice responses pursuant to this section shall submit an interagency agreement to the Department of Justice to establish authorization to submit and receive information pursuant to this section.

(f) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Every agency handling Department of Justice information shall ensure the following:

(1) No recipient may disclose its contents or provide copies of information.

(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be accessible to the custodian of records.

(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination, auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 700 through 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 840, Sec. 7.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44830.3.

(a) The governing board of any school district that maintains prekindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, classes in bilingual education, or special education programs, may, in consultation with a regionally accredited institution of higher education offering an approved program of pedagogical teacher preparation, employ persons authorized by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to provide service as district interns to provide instruction to pupils in those grades or classes as a classroom teacher. The governing board shall require that each district intern be assisted and guided by a certificated employee selected through a competitive process adopted by the governing board after consultation with the exclusive teacher representative unit or by personnel employed by institutions of higher education
 to supervise student teachers. These certificated employees shall possess valid certification at the same level, or of the same type of credential, as the district interns they serve.

(b) The governing board of each school district employing district interns shall develop and implement a professional development plan for district interns in consultation with a regionally accredited institution of higher education offering an approved program of pedagogical preparation. The professional development plan shall include all of the following:

(1) Provisions for an annual evaluation of the district intern.

(2) As the governing board determines necessary, a description of courses to be completed by the district intern, if any, and a plan for the completion of preservice or other clinical training, if any, including student
 teaching.

(3) Mandatory preservice training for district interns tailored to the grade level or class to be taught, through either of the following options:

(A) One hundred twenty clock hours of preservice training and orientation in the aspects of child development, classroom organization and management, pedagogy, and methods of teaching the subject field or fields in which the district intern will be assigned, which training and orientation period shall be under the direct supervision of an experienced permanent teacher. In addition, persons holding district intern certificates issued by the commission pursuant to Section 44325 shall receive orientation in methods of teaching pupils with disabilities. At the conclusion of the preservice training period, the permanent teacher shall provide the district with information regarding the area that should be emphasized in the future
 training of the district intern.

(B) The successful completion, before service by the intern in any classroom, of six semester units of coursework from a regionally accredited institution of higher education designed in cooperation with the school district to provide instruction and orientation in the aspects of child development and the methods of teaching the subject matter or matters in which the district intern will be assigned.

(4) Instruction in child development and the methods of teaching during the first semester of service for district interns teaching in prekindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, including bilingual education classes and special education programs.

(5) Instruction in the culture and methods of teaching bilingual pupils during the first year of service for district
 interns teaching pupils in bilingual classes and, for persons holding district intern certificates issued by the commission pursuant to Section 44325, instruction in the etiology and methods of teaching pupils with disabilities.

(6) Any other criteria that may be required by the governing board.

(7) In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, the professional development plan for district interns teaching in special education programs shall also include 120 clock hours of mandatory training and supervised fieldwork that shall include, but not be limited to, instructional practices, and the procedures and pedagogy of both general education programs and special education programs that teach pupils with disabilities.

(8) In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) to
 (6), inclusive, the professional development plan for district interns teaching bilingual classes shall also include 120 clock hours of mandatory training and orientation, which shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in subject matter relating to bilingual-crosscultural language and academic development.

(9) The professional development plan for district interns teaching in special education programs shall be based on the standards adopted by the commission as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 44327.

(c) Each district intern and each district teacher assigned to supervise the district intern during the preservice period shall be compensated for the preservice period required pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). The compensation shall be that which is normally provided by each district for staff development or in-service
 activity.

(d) Upon completion of service sufficient to meet program standards and performance assessments, the governing board may recommend to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that the district intern be credentialed in the manner prescribed by Section 44328.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 31.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44830.5.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is contrary to the interests of this state and the people thereof for the governing board of any school district to adhere to a strict ethnic ratio in the assignment of certificated employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1179.)
-------------------------------------------

44830.7.

Every contract for employment for a position requiring certification qualifications between a school district governing board and a person who possesses certification qualifications from another state shall provide that employment shall terminate upon notice by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to the district and the employee, that the employee does not have the necessary qualifications for the credential required by law for the position for which the service was rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 10.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44831.

The governing board of a school district shall employ persons in public school service requiring certification qualifications as provided in this code, except that the governing board or a county office of education may contract with or employ an individual who holds a license issued by the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board and has earned a master’s degree in communication disorders to provide speech and language services if that individual meets the requirements of Section 44332.6 before employment or execution of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 36.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44832.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 44842, and except for employees who are notified pursuant to Section 44955, each classroom teacher shall, by May 15 of each year, inform the employing school district whether he or she intends to return to a teaching position for the following school year. 

(b) The school district and the exclusive bargaining representative may agree to include provisions regarding the requirements of subdivision (a) in any collective bargaining agreement applying to classroom teachers. 

(c) This section shall apply only to teachers in school districts having an average daily attendance of less than 2,500.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44833.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 44001, 44830, 44831, or any other provision of law, a noncertificated student enrolled in any public or private college or university in California may be permitted by the governing board of a school district maintaining any of grades 1 through 8, to serve in elementary schools or child care centers as a nonteaching aide under the following conditions:

(a) Such service by the student is based upon a program for the part-time employment of students established by the college or university under those provisions of the federal statute cited as the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 452, of the 88th Congress), and acts amendatory thereof, which provide for federal financial grants for work-study programs.

(b) The compensation being received by the student for such services is provided, at least in part, by grants made to the college or university by the government of the United States for a program of the type specified in subdivision (a). 

(c) The student has been determined under procedures established by the Department of Education to be free of any disability of person or character (other than in professional competency) which would prohibit the issuance to him of any credential or certification document provided for under this code if he were otherwise qualified therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44834.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after the effective date of this section the governing board of a school district may employ an individual in any administrative or supervisory position, irrespective of whether or not that person holds any supervisory or administrative credential if he or she meets all of the following criteria:

(1) He or she holds a valid teaching credential.

(2) He or she has completed 15 years service as a teacher, as defined in Section 41011, including 10 years of teaching service in the employ of the district which appoints him or her to an administrative or supervisory position.

(3) The last 10 years of service immediately preceding his or her appointment to an administrative or supervisory position were as a teacher of the natural sciences, the social sciences (other than education or educational methodology), the humanities, mathematics, and the fine arts.

(b) Commencing January 1, 1991, subdivision (a) shall apply only to persons who were employed by the governing board of a school district in a supervisory or administrative position on or before January 1, 1991, pursuant to the requirements of this section as it read on December 31, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 979, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44834.1.

On or before June 30, 1991, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall adopt criteria to exempt from the requirement of obtaining an administrative services credential those certificated employees who participate in innovative programs of school organization that may be developed by the certificated personnel, including, but not limited to, administrators and teachers of a school district. Any exemption granted by the commission under this section shall be valid only in the school district for which the exemption has been approved.

It is the intent of the Legislature that institutions of higher education be encouraged to actively participate in partnerships with the local governing boards of school districts, school district administrators, teachers, and other certificated personnel in the development and implementation of innovative programs of school organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 979, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

44834.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the minimum requirements for the administrative services credential prescribed by Sections 44270 and 44270.1 include an integration of theoretical knowledge and the demonstration of skills. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the minimum requirements for the administrative services credential reflect an appropriate balance of coursework, supervised fieldwork, and related experiences designed to contribute to the development and improvement of the educational leadership skills necessary to perform the duties of a school administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44835.

A student providing services in elementary schools or child development facilities as a nonteaching aide shall perform no instructional work; but shall, under the immediate supervision and direction of a certificated employee, perform noninstructional work which serves to assist certificated personnel in performance of teaching and administrative responsibilities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44836.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district shall not employ or retain in employment persons in public school service who have been convicted, or who have been convicted following a plea of nolo contendere to charges, of any sex offense as defined in Section 44010.

(2) If a person’s conviction of a sex offense as defined in Section 44010 is reversed and the person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter. If the dismissal was pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code and the victim of the sex offense was a minor, this section does prohibit the person’s employment.

(b) (1) The governing board of a school district also shall not employ or retain in employment persons in public school service who have been convicted of any controlled substance offense as defined in Section 44011. 

(2) If a person’s conviction for a controlled substance offense as defined in Section 44011 is reversed and the person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges against him or her are dismissed, this section does not prohibit his or her employment thereafter.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the governing board of a school district may employ a person convicted of a controlled substance offense in a position requiring certification qualifications if that person holds an appropriate credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 840, Sec. 8.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

44837.

Governing boards of school districts shall not employ or retain in employment any person in public school service who has been determined to be a sexual psychopath under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300), Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or under similar provisions of law of any other state. If, however, such determination is reversed and the person is determined not to be a sexual psychopath in a new proceeding or the proceeding to determine whether he is a sexual psychopath is dismissed, this section does not prohibit his employment thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44838.

The governing board of a school district shall, as a condition to employment, require an applicant for a position requiring certification qualification to furnish a statement of the military service of the applicant and, if any was rendered, a copy of the discharge or release from service. If no such document is available, the governing board may accept other suitable evidence of the conditions under which the military service of the applicant was terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44839.
